Utah statutes.
63G-6-820 (Superseded 05/01/13).   Interest rate.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), in controversies between the state and contractors under this part, interest on amounts ultimately determined to be due to a contractor or to the state are payable at the rate applicable to judgments from the date the claim arose through the date of decision or judgment, whichever is later.

(2)  This section does not apply to public assistance benefits programs.



Amended by Chapter 347, 2012 General Session, (Coordination Clause) 

Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

